Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-536
No attribution of activities constituting doing business or for establishing jurisdiction.

In determining whether a foreign series limited liability company or foreign protected series of the company does business in this state or is subject to the personal jurisdiction of the courts of this state:

(1) the activities and affairs of the company are not attributable to a foreign protected series of the company solely by reason of the foreign protected series being a foreign protected series of the company; and

(2) the activities and affairs of a foreign protected series are not attributable to the company or another foreign protected series of the company solely by reason of the foreign protected series being a foreign protected series of the company.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 37.
January 1, 2021